inc/flattened/verb_suffixes_flattened_abstract.lexc
LEXICON VAIO_TAG
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>egw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>an%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>aang%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>angw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>aam%>b1aan2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>ego%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>am%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>aangi%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>ango%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>aam%>b1aan2%>%>h #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>ego%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>am%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>aangi%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>ango%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>egw #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>an #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>aang #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>angw #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Mode@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>aan%>%>h #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Neg+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>kegon2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Neg+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>ken2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Neg+Neu+Incl+%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>%>sii%>%>daany1%>an #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Neg+Neu+Incl+%0SgO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>%>siidaa #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Neg+Neu+MISSING:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>%>sii%>%>daany1%>ag #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+Del+2Pl+%0SgO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>keg #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+Del+2Sg+%0SgO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>kan #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+Imm+2Pl+%0SgO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>%>g #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+Imm+2Sg+%0SgO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>n #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+Imm+Incl+%0SgO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>%>daa #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+Incl+%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>%>daany1%>an #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+MISSING:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>%>daany1%>ag #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@%>%>c1%>si%>gwaa #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@%>%>c1%>ng%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@%>%>c1%>ng%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+MISSING:@D.Person@@D.Passive@%>%>c1%>d1%>%>y1%>ag #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+MISSING:@D.Person@@D.Passive@%>%>c1%>nid1%>%>y1%>an #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>nd1i%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@@R.Ccnj@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+MISSING:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@@R.Ccnj@%>%>c1%>nip%>an2%>%>ii%>an #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@@R.Ccnj@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+MISSING:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@@R.Ccnj@%>%>c1%>p%>an2%>%>ii%>ag #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>nd1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@%>%>c1%>waag%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@%>%>c1%>waag%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>waap%>an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>waad1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Obv+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@%>%>c1%>nig%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3Obv+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@%>%>c1%>nig%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Obv+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>nip%>an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Obv+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>nid1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>c1%>g%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>c1%>g%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>p%>an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>d1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+MISSING:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@%>%>c1%>g%>%>w4%>en2%>ag #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+MISSING:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@%>%>c1%>nig%>%>w4%>en2%>an #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+MISSING:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@%>%>c1%>g%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2%>ag #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+MISSING:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@%>%>c1%>nig%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2%>an #;
@D.Person@@P.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>aan%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@%>%>c1%>si%>ng%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@%>%>c1%>si%>ng%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+MISSING:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@%>%>c1%>si%>d1%>%>y1%>ag #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+MISSING:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@%>%>c1%>si%>nid1%>%>y1%>an #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>si%>nd1i%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@@R.Ccnj@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+MISSING:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@@R.Ccnj@%>%>c1%>si%>nip%>an2%>%>ii%>an #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@@R.Ccnj@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+MISSING:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@@R.Ccnj@%>%>c1%>si%>p%>an2%>%>ii%>ag #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>si%>nd1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Obv+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@%>%>c1%>si%>nig%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3Obv+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@%>%>c1%>si%>nig%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Obv+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>si%>nip%>an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Obv+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>si%>nid1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>c1%>si%>g%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>c1%>si%>g%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>si%>p%>an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>si%>gw4 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+MISSING:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@%>%>c1%>si%>g%>%>w4%>en2%>ag #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+MISSING:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@%>%>c1%>si%>nig%>%>w4%>en2%>an #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+MISSING:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@%>%>c1%>si%>g%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2%>ag #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+MISSING:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@R.Ccnj@%>%>c1%>si%>nig%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2%>an #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@R.Negation@@P.Mode.Yes@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@R.Negation@@P.Mode.Yes@%>%>c1%>si%>waag%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@R.Negation@@P.Mode.Yes@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@R.Negation@@P.Mode.Yes@%>%>c1%>si%>waag%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@R.Negation@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Passive@@R.Negation@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>si%>waap%>an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>c1%>si%>%>w4%>egw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>c1%>si%>%>w4%>an%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>c1%>si%>%>w4%>aang%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>c1%>si%>%>w4%>angw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>c1%>si%>%>w4%>aam%>b1aan2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>c1%>si%>%>w4%>ego%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>c1%>si%>%>w4%>am%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>c1%>si%>%>w4%>aangi%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>c1%>si%>%>w4%>ango%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>siw%>aam%>b1aan2%>%>h #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>siw%>ego%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>siw%>am%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>siw%>aangi%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:@D.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>siw%>ango%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
